Oklahoma, session 2025, SB744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 199, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 199. A. It shall be a misdemeanor for any employer, as
defined in Section 165.1 of this title, or his or her agent to
discharge, penalize, or in any other manner discriminate against any
employee because:
1. The employee has filed a complaint with his or her employer,
or the Commissioner of Labor or his or her authorized
representative, to enforce any provision of Sections 71 through
198.2 of this title;
2. The employee has caused to be instituted a proceeding or
investigation related to an alleged violation of any provision of
Sections 71 through 198.2 of this title; or

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB744 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. The employee has testified or is about to testify in an
investigation or proceeding under this title;
4. The employee has exercised his or her right to vote as
protected in Section 4 of Article II of the Oklahoma Constitution in
the course of his or her duties as an elected official; or
5. The employee has exercised his or her right of free speech
as protected in Section 22 of Article II of the Oklahoma
Constitution in the course of his or her duties as an elected
official.
B. Every employer, as defined in Section 165.1 of this title,
or his or her agent shall be guilty of a misdemeanor if:
1. The filing of a complaint with the employer, Commissioner of
Labor or his or her authorized representative, or the taking of any
action directly related to the complaint by any employee is a
substantial and material factor in the discharge, penalization of or
any other discrimination against the employee by the employer or his
or her agent; or
2. The employer or his or her agent has acted in a manner which
has the effect of discouraging, restraining, coercing, or
interfering with any employee in the exercise of the employee’s
rights contained in Sections 71 through 198.2 of this title.
C. Every person convicted of violating a prohibition of this
section shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more
than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or imprisoned in the county jail
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB744 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

for not less than five (5) days nor more than thirty (30) days, or
both.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
AND TOURISM
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB744 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)